New York, session 2025-2026, S9355.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 2 of section 1676 of the 2 public authorities law is amended by adding a new undesignated paragraph 3 to read as follows: 4 D'Youville Housing Association LLC for the purpose of financing or 5 refinancing the acquisition, design, construction, reconstruction, reha- 6 bilitation, improvement, furnishing and equipping of, or otherwise 7 providing for residential housing located on the campus of D'Youville 8 University. 9 § 2. Subdivision 1 of section 1680 of the public authorities law is 10 amended by adding a new undesignated paragraph to read as follows: 11 D'Youville Housing Association LLC for the purpose of financing or 12 refinancing the acquisition, design, construction, reconstruction, reha- 13 bilitation, improvement, furnishing and equipping of, or otherwise 14 providing for residential housing located on the campus of D'Youville 15 University. 16 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15098-01-6